Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 16 Higher Education Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.

Misconduct of college or university student off campus as grounds for expulsion, suspension or other disciplinary action, 28 ALR4th 463.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.